Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 3
UNINCORPORATED AREAS - DISCHARGE OF FIREARMS PROHIBITED

30-15-301. Definitions.

As used in this part 3, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Firearm" or "firearms" means any pistol, revolver, rifle, or other weapon of any description from which any shot, projectile, or bullet may be discharged.

Source:

L. 66:

p. 4, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-22-1.

Cross references:

For definitions applicable to this article, see § 30-26-301 (2)(d).

30-15-302. Board of county commissioners to designate area.

The board of county commissioners of any county in this state may designate, by resolution, areas in the unincorporated territory of such county in which it is unlawful for any person to discharge any firearms, except a duly authorized law enforcement officer acting in the line of duty, but nothing in this subsection (1) shall prevent the discharge of any firearm in shooting galleries or in any private grounds or residence under circumstances when such firearm can be discharged in such a manner as not to endanger persons or property and also in such a manner as to prevent the projectile from any such firearm from traversing any grounds or space outside the limits of such shooting gallery, grounds, or residence.

No area shall be so designated under authority of subsection (1) of this section unless it has an average population density of not less than one hundred persons per square mile in the area designated, and, before making any such designation, the board of county commissioners shall hold a public hearing thereon at which any interested person shall have an opportunity to be heard. The provisions of article 3 of title 33, C.R.S., concerning the state's liability for damages done to property by wild animals protected by the game laws of the state shall not apply to any area designated by a board of county commissioners under authority of this part 3.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict or otherwise affect any person's constitutional right to bear arms or his right to the defense of his person, his family, or his property.

Source:

L. 66:

p. 4, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-22-2.

30-15-303. Violation - penalty.

Any person violating any provisions of this part 3 commits a petty offense.

Source:

L. 66:

p. 5, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-22-3.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3248, § 504, effective March 1, 2022.

30-15-304. Jurisdiction - enforcement.

County courts, in their respective counties, have jurisdiction in prosecutions of violations of this part 3. It is the duty of the sheriff and his undersheriffs and deputies, in their respective counties, to enforce the provisions of this part 3.

Source:

L. 66:

p. 5, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-22-4.